Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1220
Act, how cited.

Sections 84-1201 to 84-1227 shall be known and may be cited as the Records Management Act.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 20, p. 1394;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 590, § 13.